Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers

7-84-301. Powers of municipality — General — Enumerated.

The governing body of any municipality has all the powers necessary or convenient to undertake and carry out any or all improvements adopted in the ordinance setting up such district, including, but not limited to:

Closing existing streets or alleys or opening new streets and alleys or widening or narrowing existing streets and alleys in whole or in part;

The power to condemn and take easements necessarily incidental to the plan of improvement adopted for such district. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the rules and procedures set forth in title 29, chapter 17, shall govern all condemnation proceedings;

Acquire any and all other real or personal property by gift, purchase, or devise;

Construct or install pedestrian or shopping malls, plazas, sidewalks or moving sidewalks, parks, parking lots and parking garages, bus stop shelters, decorative lighting, benches or other seating furniture, sculptures, telephone booths, traffic signs, fire hydrants, kiosks, trash receptacles, marquees, awnings, canopies, walls and barriers, paintings, murals, alleys, shelters, display cases, fountains, child care facilities, rest rooms, information booths, aquariums, aviaries, tunnels and ramps, pedestrian and vehicular overpasses and underpasses, and each and every other useful or necessary or desired improvement;

Landscape and plant trees, bushes and shrubbery, flowers and each and every other kind of decorative planting;

Install and operate, or lease, public music and news facilities;

Purchase and operate buses, mini-buses, mobile benches, and other modes of transportation;

Construct and operate child care facilities;

Adopt such zoning regulations and building codes for such central business improvement districts as will best promote the overall improvement district plan;

Lease space within the district for sidewalk cafe tables and chairs;

Construct lakes, dams, and waterways of whatever size;

Provide special police facilities and personnel for the protection and enjoyment of the property owners and the general public using the facilities of such central business improvement district;

Maintain, as provided in this chapter, all government-owned streets, alleys, malls, bridges, ramps, tunnels, lawns, trees and decorative plantings of each and every nature, and every structure or object of any nature whatsoever constructed or operated by the municipality;

Grant permits for newsstands, sidewalk cafes, and each and every other useful or necessary or desired private usage of public or private property;

Prohibit or restrict vehicular traffic on such streets within the central business improvement district as the governing body may deem necessary and to provide the means for access by emergency vehicles to or in such areas;

Acquire, construct, reconstruct, extend, maintain, or repair parking lots or parking garages, both above and below ground, or other facilities for the parking of vehicles, including the power to install such facilities in public areas, whether such areas are owned in fee or by easement;

Remove any existing structures or signs of any description in the district not conforming to the plan of improvements;

Require any or all utilities servicing the central business improvement district to lay such pipe, extend such wires, provide such facilities, or conform or modify existing facilities to effectuate the plan of improvement for the district; the governing body shall determine what portion of the cost is to be borne out of general revenues of the municipality, what portion is to be paid from the special assessments provided in this chapter, and what portion is to be paid individually by the property owners within the central business improvement district; and

Do each and every and any thing necessary or desirable to effectuate the plan of improvement for the central business improvement district of the municipality.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-3907.

Cross-References. Alternative method of establishing and governing district, §7-84-506.

Collateral References.

Classification and maintenance of advertising structures as nonconforming use. 80 A.L.R.3d 630.

Determination of just compensation for condemnation of billboards or other advertising signs. 73 A.L.R.3d 1122.

Governmental borrowing or expenditure for purposes of acquiring, maintaining, or improving stadium for use of professional athletic team. 67 A.L.R.3d 1186.

Validity and construction of ordinance prohibiting roof signs. 76 A.L.R.3d 1162.

Validity and construction of provision prohibiting or regulating advertising sign overhanging street or sidewalk. 80 A.L.R.3d 687.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting off-premises advertising structures. 81 A.L.R.3d 486.

Validity and construction of state or local regulation prohibiting the erection or maintenance of advertising structures within a specified distance of street or highway. 81 A.L.R.3d 564.

Validity of regulation providing for reserved parking spaces or parking priority on publicly owned property for members of a designated group. 70 A.L.R.3d 1323.

7-84-302. Bids — Contracts — Construction — Detailed plan.

Upon the adoption of the ordinance, the municipality shall proceed to advertise for bids, let the contracts, and construct the improvements under the laws and regulations governing the construction of other improvements within the municipality; provided, that where no detailed plan of improvements has yet been prepared, the municipality shall employ architects and engineers for the drafting of such plan, and, upon approval of such plan, shall thereafter, and within four (4) months time, advertise for bids.

If a municipality acquires improvements from a third party, including a private entity, subsection (a) shall not apply.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 13; T.C.A., § 6-3913; Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-303. Board of assessment commissioners.

The board of assessment commissioners authorized in this chapter shall consist of no fewer than three (3) nor more than seven (7) citizens of the municipality, none of whom shall be interested in any property contained within the central business improvement district. Such members shall be not less than thirty (30) years of age and shall serve until completion of their duties. A majority of such commissioners shall constitute a quorum and be competent to perform any duty required of these commissioners; and they shall be notified of their appointment, and vacancies in their number shall be filled, by the governing body, and they shall be sworn to the faithful discharge of their duties.

The commissioners shall view each property located within the improvement district and shall:

Determine the amount of the assessment to be levied upon each such property, according to the benefit conferred by the improvements; and

Ascertain and award the amount of damages and compensation to be paid to the owners of property that is to be taken or injured by such improvements.

The board of assessment commissioners shall be reimbursed for the performance of their duties at a rate to be determined by the governing body of the municipality, and such reimbursement shall be considered a cost of the improvements and reimbursed from the special assessments as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 14; T.C.A., § 6-3914.

Cross-References. Determination of benefit to property, §7-84-404.

7-84-304. Notice to real property owner.

In any case where a notice is required to be sent to the owner of real property in the central business improvement district, such notice shall be deemed sufficient if sent by certified mail to the last known address of the owner. In any case where the governing body finds for any reason that due notice was not given, the governing body shall not lose jurisdiction by due notice not being given, and the proceeding in question shall not be void or be abated by due notice not being given, but the governing body, in that case, shall order due notice given and shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice shall be properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 35; T.C.A., § 6-3935.

Cross-References. Notice of hearing on establishment of district, §7-84-205.

7-84-305. Borrowing in anticipation of bond proceeds authorized.

The municipality is authorized to issue bonds and notes pursuant to the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, for the purpose of making payments for the improvements contemplated by this chapter. Such municipality is further authorized to make such payments out of any funds as may be available for such purpose.

The municipality may issue revenue bonds in the manner provided in the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, including part 3, to finance all costs and expenses incurred in connection with the acquisition or construction of improvements contemplated by this chapter and costs related to the issuance of bonds. In that case, all assessments received pursuant to this chapter by the municipality shall be deemed revenues for purposes of the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986. In such a case, the revenue bonds may be, but are not required to be, additionally secured by the full faith and credit of the municipality.

Any municipality is also authorized to delegate to any industrial development corporation incorporated by the municipality or any other municipality in which the central business improvement district is located the authority to issue the revenue bonds, in which case the municipality shall enter into an agreement with the industrial development corporation pursuant to which the municipality shall agree to promptly pay to the industrial development corporation the assessments, including any interest on the assessments, as collected. The assessments shall be held in trust by the municipality for the benefit of the industrial development corporation when received. The municipality may direct any property owner that is required to pay assessments to make the payments directly to an industrial development corporation or its assignee. If an industrial development corporation issues the bonds, assessments imposed pursuant to this chapter, and any interest collected on the assessments, shall constitute revenues, as defined in § 7-53-101, and improvements and related expenses described in this chapter, whether acquired by the industrial development corporation on behalf of the municipality or by the municipality itself, shall constitute a project as defined in § 7-53-101. Any municipality is authorized to delegate to an industrial development corporation the authority to acquire an improvement described in the ordinance organizing the central business improvement district, or any amendment to the ordinance, on behalf of the municipality. All bonds issued by industrial development corporations pursuant to this section shall be issued in accordance with chapter 53 of this title.

Any municipality is also authorized to delegate to any public building authority the authority to issue the revenue bonds, in which case the municipality shall enter into an agreement with the public building authority pursuant to which the municipality shall agree to promptly pay to the public building authority the assessments, including any interest on the assessments, as collected and the assessments shall be held in trust by the municipality for the benefit of the public building authority when received. The municipality may direct any property owner that is required to pay assessments to make the payments directly to a public building authority or its assignee. If a public building authority issues the bonds, assessments imposed pursuant to this chapter, and any interest collected on the assessments shall constitute revenues, as defined in § 12-10-103 and improvements and related expenses described in this chapter, whether acquired by the public building authority on behalf of the municipality or by the municipality itself, shall constitute a project, as defined in § 12-10-103. Any municipality is authorized to delegate to a public building authority the authority to acquire an improvement described in the ordinance organizing the central business improvement district or any amendment to the ordinance on behalf of the municipality. All bonds issued by public building authorities pursuant to this section shall be issued in accordance with the Public Building Authorities Act of 1971, compiled in title 12, chapter 10.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the issuance of any bonds or other obligations by any public entity acting pursuant to this chapter, the public entity shall give notice of the proposed issuance of the bonds or other obligations to the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and shall also provide the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee with a copy of the ordinance or resolution authorizing the bonds or other obligations.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 36; T.C.A., § 6-3936; Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 38; 2007, ch. 494, § 8; 2010, ch. 868, § 28.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 494, § 14 provided that the act shall apply to central business improvement districts already in existence and any districts that hereinafter may be created.

7-84-306. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §7-84-306 (Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 37; T.C.A., § 6-3937), concerning bond issues, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 39.

7-84-307. Fees.

The governing body of the municipality is hereby authorized to levy, according to the benefits received, and to collect in such manner as the governing body may determine to be proper, annual service or maintenance fees against the properties located within the central business improvement district for the maintenance, upkeep, and repairs of all public properties located within such district, including, but not limited to, capital improvements, movable furniture or fixtures, and all trees, plants, and decorative plantings of each and every kind. Additionally, such fees may cover the cost of additional fire and police protection required for, or desired by, such central business improvement district and all operating expenses of such special facilities provided in the district as are not charged by the governing body against the general revenues of the municipality.

Acts 1971, ch. 268, § 38; T.C.A., § 6-3938.